Washington statutes.
RCW 41.58.802

Procedure for transfer of budgeted fund or equipment.

Where transfers of budgeted funds or equipment are required under *this act, the director of financial management shall certify such transfers to the agencies affected, the state auditor and the state treasurer all of whom shall make the appropriate transfer and adjustments in funds and appropriation accounts and equipment records in accordance with such certification.

[ 1979 c 151 s 67; 1975-'76 2nd ex.s. c 5 s 5.]

NOTES:

*Reviser's note: For codification of "this act" [1975-'76 2nd ex.s. c 5], see Codification Tables.